Alabama, session 2026rs, SB173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-6-142, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-6-142
(a) A person commits the crime of violation of a
domestic violence protection order if the person knowingly
commits any act prohibited by a domestic violence protection
order or willfully fails to abide by any term of a domestic
violence protection order.
(b) A violation of a domestic violence protection order
is a Class A misdemeanor which shall be punishable as provided
by law. A second conviction for violation of a domestic
violence protection order, in addition to any other penalty or
fine, shall be punishable by a minimum of 30 days imprisonment
which may not be suspended. A third or subsequent conviction
is a Class C felony.
(c) In addition to any other fine or penalty provided
by law, the court shall order the defendant to pay an
additional fine of fifty dollars ($50) for a violation of a
domestic violence protection order to be distributed to the
Domestic Violence Trust Fund, established by Section 30-6-11.
Page 1

Domestic Violence Trust Fund, established by Section 30-6-11.
SB173 Enrolled
(d)(1) Except for violations of this section that are
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile courts of this state,
the district courts of this state shall have exclusive
original jurisdiction over prosecutions for violations of this
section or any other prosecution for an action that would
constitute a violation of this section except as provided in
Section 12-12-32.
(2) Except for violations of this section that are
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile courts of this state,
any prosecution for a violation of this section, or any other
prosecution for an action that would constitute a violation of
this section, that is pending on October 1, 2026, shall be
transferred to the district court.
(3) This subsection shall not apply to violations
arising from a domestic violence protection order issued by a
municipal court."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
SB173 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB173
Senate 17-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Amended and passed: 08-Apr-26




Senate concurred in House amendment 08-Apr-26




By: Senator Bell
Page 3